Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1582
Regional housing agency; resolution or ordinance; effect.

Upon the adoption of a resolution or ordinance, as provided in section 71-1581, by two or more cities or counties, a regional housing agency shall be established, and except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Housing Agency Act, such regional housing agency shall have perpetual existence unless dissolved in accordance with law.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 11.